Washington statutes.
RCW 2.56.032

Youth-level secure detention data—Uniform data standards—Annual reports.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1391-S2.SL) ***

(1)(a) To accurately track the extent to which courts order youth into a secure detention facility in Washington state for the violation of a court order related to a truancy, at-risk youth, or a child in need of services petition, all juvenile courts shall transmit youth-level secure detention data to the administrative office of the courts.

(b) Data may either be entered into the statewide management information system for juvenile courts or securely transmitted to the administrative office of the courts at least monthly. Juvenile courts shall provide, at a minimum, the name and date of birth for the youth, the court case number assigned to the petition, the reasons for admission to the juvenile detention facility, the date of admission, the date of exit, and the time the youth spent in secure confinement.

(c) Courts are also encouraged to report individual-level data reflecting whether a detention alternative, such as electronic monitoring, was used, and the time spent in detention alternatives.

(d) The administrative office of the courts and the juvenile court administrators must work to develop uniform data standards for detention.

(2) The administrative office of the courts shall deliver an annual statewide report to the legislature that details the number of Washington youth who are placed into detention facilities during the preceding calendar year. The first report shall be delivered by March 1, 2017, and shall detail the most serious reason for detention and youth gender, race, and ethnicity. The report must have a specific emphasis on youth who are detained for reasons relating to a truancy, at-risk youth, or a child in need of services petition. The report must:

(a) Consider the written findings described in RCW 7.21.030(2)(e)(ii)(B), and provide an analysis of the rationale and evidence used and the less restrictive options considered;

(b) Monitor the utilization of alternatives to detention;

(c) Track trends in the use of at-risk youth petitions;

(d) Track trends in the use of secure residential programs with intensive wraparound services; and

(e) Track the race and gender of youth with at-risk petitions.

[2019 c 312 s 17; 2016 c 205 s 19.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Findings—Intent—2019 c 312: See notes following RCW 7.21.080.